Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 14
SNOWMOBILES

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984 with an effective date of January 1, 1985. Prior to 1984, the substantive provisions of this article were contained in article 7 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

33-14-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrative costs" includes, but is not limited to, printing, postage, mailing, and personnel related to registration processing.

"Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles at wholesale or retail in this state.

"Direct services" includes, but is not limited to, the activities and expenses associated with law enforcement, safety certification, capital equipment, rescue and first aid equipment, snowmobile facilities, and division and contract services related to clearing parking lots and providing trail maintenance.

"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing snowmobiles in this state.

"Operate" means to ride in or on and control the operation of a snowmobile.

"Operator" means every person who operates or is in actual physical control of a snowmobile.

"Owner" means a person, other than a lienholder, having title to a snowmobile and entitled to the use or possession thereof.

"Person" means any individual, association, partnership, or public or private corporation, any municipal corporation, county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other public or private organization of any character.

(8.5) "Possession" means physical custody of a snowmobile by any owner of a snowmobile or by any owner of a motor vehicle or trailer on or in which a snowmobile is placed for the purpose of transport.

"Renter" means a person primarily engaged in the business of renting snowmobiles.

"Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel.

"Snowmobile" means a self-propelled vehicle primarily designed or altered for travel on snow or ice when supported in part by skis, belts, or cleats. "Snowmobile" does not include machinery used strictly for the grooming of snowmobile trails or ski slopes.

(11.5) "Staging area" means any parking lot, trailhead, or other location to or from which any snowmobile is transported by truck, trailer, or other motor vehicle where it is placed into operation or removed from operation. "Staging area" does not include any location to which a snowmobile is transported primarily for the purpose of service, maintenance, repair, storage, or sale.

"Street", "road", "freeway", or "highway" means the entire right-of-way between boundary lines of any of such public ways when any part thereof is open to the use of the public as a matter of right for the purpose of motor vehicle travel.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 905, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 88:

(8.5) and (11.5) added, p. 1167, § 1, effective March 24.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-101 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article 14, see § 33-10-102.

33-14-102. Snowmobile registration - fees - applications - requirements - penalties - exemptions - rules.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, no person shall operate, nor have in his possession at any staging area, any snowmobile within the state unless such snowmobile has been registered and numbered in accordance with the provisions of this article. The division is authorized to assign identification numbers and register snowmobiles.

The division shall employ snowmobile agents, including dealers and licensing agents serving as such for the division, for snowmobile registration pursuant to section 33-12-104. The agents shall take the registration application and issue a temporary registration and shall forward the application to the division, which shall issue the registration. Snowmobile dealers employed as licensing agents for snowmobile registration are authorized to issue annual registrations and shall retain a commission of up to one dollar, as authorized by the division, for each registration issued.

Every dealer shall require a purchaser of a new or used snowmobile sold at retail from the dealer's inventory to complete a registration application and pay the registration fee before the snowmobile leaves the dealer's premises, except for those snowmobiles purchased for use exclusively outside of this state. Any dealer who does not comply with this subsection (2)(a) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 339, § 5, effective July 1, 1995.)

Each snowmobile owned by a dealer for rental purposes shall be registered pursuant to this section upon payment of an owner's fee as provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section.

For all or any part of a year beginning October 1 and ending September 30, the original and each renewal registration fee to be paid by an owner must be in the amount specified by the commission by rule.

The fee for replacement of a lost, mutilated, or destroyed registration or validation decal shall be as specified in section 33-12-101.

For each year beginning October 1 and ending September 30 or portion of the year for which the registration is made, the amount of the registration fee for all snowmobiles owned by a dealer or manufacturer that are operated for demonstration or testing purposes only must be in the amount specified by the commission by rule.

Dealer and manufacturer registrations are not transferable and shall be distinguished by appropriate means by the division from the registration required for owners other than dealers and manufacturers.

A registration certificate shall be issued without the payment of a fee for snowmobiles owned by the state of Colorado or a political subdivision thereof upon application therefor.

No registration under this section is required for the following snowmobiles:

Snowmobiles owned by any agency of the United States, another state, or a political subdivision of either, when such ownership is clearly displayed on the machine;

Snowmobiles owned by a resident of another state or country if such snowmobiles are covered by a valid license of such other state or country and such snowmobiles have not been within this state for more than thirty consecutive days;

Snowmobiles used strictly on private property for private, noncommercial purposes;

Snowmobiles used only in sanctioned snowmobile races, including any racing snowmobile brought into the state which is exempt from registration in the state where the owner of said snowmobile resides.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 339, § 5, effective July 1, 1995.)

All registrations shall expire at the end of the year for which issued. Application for renewal of registration for the succeeding year shall be made at such time and in such manner as the division shall prescribe.

Any person who operates a snowmobile in violation of this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 88:

(1)(a) amended and (6)(d) added, pp. 1167, 1168, §§ 2, 3, effective March 24.

L. 95:

(1)(b), (2)(a), (2)(b), (7), and (9) amended, p. 339, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3)(a) and (4)(a) amended, p. 782, § 7, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) and (9) amended, p. 1949, § 26, effective May 22.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1391, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(3)(a) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 18-1139), ch. 71, p. 634, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(9) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3698, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) and (9) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 578, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-102 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1139, see section 1 of chapter 71, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-103. Proof of ownership for registration purposes.

The division shall require proof of ownership for snowmobiles purchased on or after July 1, 1976, prior to the registration of a snowmobile under this article, but such proof shall not be dependent upon any certificate of title, and no such certificate shall be issued by the division.

The division shall keep a record of the manufacturer's number of all snowmobiles registered pursuant to this article and shall provide the department of revenue with a copy of said record monthly. The department of revenue shall maintain a computerized list of such record in order to aid in the recovery of stolen snowmobiles.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 907, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-102.5 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-104. Issuance of registration.

Upon receipt of a sufficient application for registration of a snowmobile, as required by section 33-14-102, the division shall enter upon its records the registration of such vehicle under the distinctive number assigned to it pursuant to this section.

A number assigned to a snowmobile at the time of its original registration shall remain with the snowmobile until the machine is destroyed, abandoned, or permanently removed from the state or until such registration number is changed or terminated by the division.

The division shall, upon assignment of such number, issue and deliver to the owner a registration in such form as the division shall prescribe. A registration shall not be valid unless it is signed by the person who signed the application for registration. In the event of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of any registration, the owner of the registered snowmobile may file such statement and proof of such facts as the division shall require for the issuance of a replacement registration.

At the time of the original registration and at the time of each annual renewal thereof, the division shall issue to said registrant a validation decal indicating the distinctive number assigned to such vehicle as provided in subsection (1) of this section and the validity of the current registration and the expiration date thereof, which validation decal shall be affixed to the snowmobile in such manner as the division may prescribe.

Notwithstanding the fact that a snowmobile has been assigned an identifying number, it shall not be considered as validly registered within the meaning of this section unless a validation decal and current registration have been issued.

In the event that a snowmobile sought to be registered or reregistered does not comply with the provisions respecting equipment established by the regulations of the division, the division may deny the issuance of a validation decal and current registration.

The registration number assigned to a snowmobile shall be displayed on the vehicle at all times in such manner as the division may, by regulation, prescribe. No number other than the number assigned to a snowmobile or the identification number of the registration in another state shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the cowling; except that racing numbers on a snowmobile being operated in a prearranged organized special event may be temporarily displayed for the duration of the race.

Every person, while operating a snowmobile in this state which is required to be registered under this article, shall have in his possession or carry in the snowmobile the registration therefor and shall, upon demand of any peace officer authorized to enforce this article, produce for inspection the registration for such snowmobile and furnish to such officer any information necessary for the identification of such snowmobile and its owner.

It is the duty of every owner holding a registration to notify the division, in writing, of any change of residence of such person within fifteen days after such change occurs and to inscribe on the registration, in the place provided, a record of such change of residence.

Any person who violates subsection (5) of this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars.

Any person who violates subsection (6) of this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 907, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(8) amended, p. 973, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(8) amended, p. 1949, § 27, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

(8) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 579, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-103 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-105. Transfer or other termination of ownership - rules.

When the use of a snowmobile for which a registration has already been issued is permanently discontinued, the old registration shall be properly signed and returned to the division within fifteen days after discontinuance.

If there is a change of ownership of a snowmobile for which a registration has been issued, the new owner shall apply for a new registration from a dealer employed as a licensing agent or from the division. The application must set forth the original number issued and must be accompanied by the old registration properly signed by the previous owner and by the required fee for registration in the amount specified by the commission by rule.

In the event that such snowmobile was purchased through a bona fide dealer, said application must be accompanied by a dealer's form, as prescribed by the division, numbered, completed, and signed by the dealer or his agent and by the new owner.

It is the duty of every owner of a snowmobile registered pursuant to the provisions of this article to notify the division, in writing, of the destruction, theft, or permanent removal of such snowmobile from the state within fifteen days thereafter, and, in the event of destruction or theft, he shall surrender the registration with such notice.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 908, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 89:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1351, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 96:

(2)(a) amended, p. 783, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 2018:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 18-1139), ch. 71, p. 635, § 6, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-104 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1139, see section 1 of chapter 71, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-14-106. Snowmobile recreation fund - creation - use of money.

Except as provided pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, all fees from the registration of snowmobiles, all money collected for fines under this article 14, and all interest earned on the fees and fines shall be credited to the snowmobile recreation fund, hereby created, and shall be used for the administration of this article 14 and for the establishment and maintenance of snowmobile trails, vehicle parking areas, and facilities. However, any fee money collected in excess of five dollars per original or renewal registration shall be used exclusively for direct services and not administrative costs.

When a Colorado peace officer other than a division of parks and wildlife officer makes an arrest or issues a citation for an offense arising from a violation of this article 14, the money collected for the resulting fine shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit one-half of the money to the snowmobile recreation fund and:

If the peace officer is employed by a local jurisdiction, one-half to the treasurer of the local jurisdiction in which the violation occurred, to be credited to the appropriate fund; or

If the peace officer is employed by another state agency, one-half to a fund administered by the state agency, as designated by the state agency.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 909, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3698, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 301, § 60, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-105 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

33-14-107. Rules.

The commission shall adopt rules, in the manner provided by article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., for the following purposes:

Registration of snowmobiles and display of registration numbers;

Formulation, in cooperation with appropriate federal agencies, of regulations for uniform maps and signs for use by the state, counties, cities, city and counties, and towns to control, direct, or regulate the operation and use of snowmobiles;

Formulation of other regulations concerning the use of snowmobiles, but not in any way inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 909, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1227, § 63, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-106 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-108. Training courses.

The division shall establish snowmobile information, safety, education, and training programs, including, but not limited to, the training of snowmobile operators, and shall issue snowmobile safety certificates and insignia to snowmobile operators who successfully complete the snowmobile safety education and training course.

The division shall cooperate with private organizations and associations, private and public corporations, and local governmental units in furtherance of the programs established under this section.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 909, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-107 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-109. Restrictions on young operators.

No person under the age of ten years may operate a snowmobile, except upon lands owned or leased by his parent or guardian, unless he is accompanied by or under the immediate supervision of a person sixteen years of age or over or by a person over fourteen years of age who holds a snowmobile safety certificate issued by the division for the successful completion of a snowmobile safety education and training course conducted by the division.

Except when accompanied or supervised in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, no person ten years of age or over who has not reached his sixteenth birthday shall operate a snowmobile in this state, except upon lands of his parent or guardian, unless he has received a snowmobile safety certificate for the successful completion of a snowmobile safety education and training course conducted by the division.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 909, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 973, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1950, § 28, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3699, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 580, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-108 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-110. Snowmobile operation on roadway of streets, roads, and highways.

A snowmobile may be operated on the roadway of a street, road, or highway in this state only as provided in this section and section 42-4-106 (3)(d).

No snowmobile may be operated on the roadway of an interstate highway or freeway except during emergency conditions declared by the proper state authority.

A snowmobile may be operated on other streets and highways under the following restrictions:

To cross a street or highway in the manner provided in section 33-14-112;

To traverse a bridge or culvert on such street or highway;

During special snowmobile events lawfully conducted pursuant to the authority granted to local subdivisions in this article;

During emergency conditions declared by proper state authority;

On the roadway of streets and highways which are not maintained for winter motor vehicle traffic;

When local subdivisions have authorized by ordinance or resolution the establishment of snowmobile routes to permit the operation of snowmobiles on city streets or county roads. No street or road which is part of the state highway system may be so designated.

When crossing railroad tracks.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 910, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1046), ch. 94, p. 452, § 2, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-109 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-111. Snowmobile operation on right-of-way of streets, roads, or highways.

Except as provided in section 33-14-110 (2), no snowmobile shall be operated on the right-of-way of any interstate highway or freeway.

A snowmobile may be operated on the right-of-way of other roads, streets, and highways as far as practicable from the roadway thereof.

When operating on the right-of-way of a road, street, or highway as authorized by this section during hours of darkness, a snowmobile shall be operated only in conformity with the flow of traffic on the nearest lane of the adjacent roadway.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 910, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 973, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1950, § 29, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3699, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 581, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-110 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-112. Crossing roads, highways, and railroad tracks.

The crossing of a road or highway by a snowmobile operator, when not prohibited by this article, shall be made only in accordance with the following provisions:

The crossing shall be made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a quick and safe crossing.

The snowmobile shall be brought to a complete stop before crossing the shoulder or, if none, the roadway, before proceeding.

The operator shall yield the right-of-way to all motor vehicle traffic on such road or highway which constitutes an immediate hazard to such crossing.

The crossing of a divided highway, when permitted under this article, shall be made only at an intersection of such highway with another road or highway.

No snowmobile may be driven upon the right-of-way of any operating railroad, except for the crossing of the tracks at their intersection with a road or highway.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 973, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1950, § 30, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3699, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 582, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-111 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-113. Operation of snowmobiles on private property.

No snowmobile shall be operated on private property other than that owned or leased by the operator or except when prior permission has been obtained from the owner, lessee, or agent of the owner or lessee. Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 973, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1950, § 31, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3268, § 583, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-112 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-114. Required equipment - snowmobiles.

No snowmobile shall be operated upon a public street or highway unless it is equipped with the following:

While being operated between the hours of sunset and sunrise, at least one lighted head lamp and one lighted tail lamp, each of a minimum candlepower as prescribed by regulation of the division;

Brakes and a muffler which conform to the standards prescribed by regulation of the division, which shall be applicable in all cases, except for snowmobiles being operated in organized races or similar competitive events held on private lands with the permission of the owner, lessee, or custodian of the land, on public lands and waters under the jurisdiction of the division with its permission, or on other public lands with the consent of the public agency owning the land.

No person shall sell or offer for sale in this state any snowmobile that is not equipped pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 974, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1950, § 32, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3699, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3269, § 584, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-115 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-115. Notice of accident.

The operator of a snowmobile involved in an accident resulting in property damage of fifteen hundred dollars or more or injuries resulting in hospitalization or death, or some person acting for the operator, or the owner of the snowmobile having knowledge of the accident shall immediately, by the quickest available means of communication, notify an officer of the Colorado state patrol, the sheriff's office of the county wherein the accident occurred, or the office of the police department of the municipality wherein the accident occurred.

Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of accident under this section shall forward a copy thereof to the division which shall compile statistics annually based upon such reports.

Within forty-eight hours after an accident involving a snowmobile, the accident shall be reported to the Denver office of the division. The report shall be made on forms furnished by the division and shall be made by the owner of the vehicle or someone acting for him.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of seventy-five dollars.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 340, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1950, § 33, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3269, § 585, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-114 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-116. Other operating restrictions.

No person shall operate a snowmobile in a careless or imprudent manner without due regard for width, grade, corners, curves, or traffic of trails, the requirements of section 33-14-110 (3), and all other attendant circumstances.

No person shall operate a snowmobile in such a manner as to indicate either a wanton or a willful disregard for the safety of persons or property.

No person shall operate a snowmobile while under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or any other drug, or any combination thereof, which renders the person incapable of the safe operation of a snowmobile.

No owner shall permit such snowmobile, while under his control, to be operated in violation of the provisions of this article.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars.

Any person who violates subsection (2) or (3) of this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates subsection (4) of this section commits a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(5) and (7) amended, p. 974, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(5) to (7) amended, p. 1950, § 34, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1631, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(5) and (7) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3699, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5), (6), and (7) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3269, § 586, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-115 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-117. Hunting, carrying weapons on snowmobiles - prohibitions.

Except as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to:

Hunt any wildlife from a snowmobile;

Operate or ride on any snowmobile with any firearm other than a pistol or a revolver in the person's possession, unless the firearm is unloaded and enclosed in a carrying case or inserted in a scabbard, or with any bow unless it is unstrung or cased; except that this subsection (1)(b) does not apply to a person to whom the division has issued a permit for the control of predators such as coyotes, foxes, and bobcats; or

Pursue, drive, or otherwise intentionally disturb or harass any wildlife by use of a snowmobile; except that a person may use a snowmobile to protect the person's crops and other property.

(1.5) A person may perform the activities listed in subsection (1) of this section if the person is otherwise authorized by law or by the division to do so.

Permits to use snowmobiles for the control of predators such as coyotes, foxes, bobcats, and the like may be issued by the division or its district wildlife managers at no charge to persons applying therefor whose purpose is to protect livestock and other wildlife.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine as follows:

For a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, two hundred dollars;

For a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, one hundred dollars; and

For a violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section, two hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 974, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1951, § 35, effective May 22.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1391, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3700, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 171, § 10, effective March 20.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3269, § 587, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-116 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-14-118. Regulation by political subdivisions.

Any county, city and county, city, or town acting by its governing body may regulate the operation of snowmobiles on public lands, waters, and property under its jurisdiction and on streets and highways within its boundaries by resolution or ordinance of the governing body and by giving appropriate notice thereof if such regulation is not inconsistent with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

No such political subdivision may adopt an ordinance which imposes a fee for the use of public land or water under the jurisdiction of any agency of the state or for the use of any access thereto owned by the state, county, city and county, city, or town; nor shall it require a snowmobile to be licensed or registered in such political subdivision.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 913, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-117 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-119. Enforcement - federal cooperation.

Every parks and recreation officer, every peace officer of this state and its political subdivisions, and every person commissioned by the division shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this article.

The division, with the advice and consent of the commission, is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with federal land management agencies for the purpose of regulating snowmobile use on federal lands.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 913, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1227, § 64, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-7-118 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-14-120. Repeal of sections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 931, § 19, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 333, § 17, effective April 3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 61, effective April 20.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 105, § 1, effective March 25.